trunk/apertium-es-pt/apertium-es-pt.es.dix
	 <pardef n="m/order__vblex">
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orderíamos</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordería</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orderíais</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orderías</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orderían</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordería</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orderemos</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orderé</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orderéis</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orderás</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orderán</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orderá</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiéremos</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiere</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiereis</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordieres</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordieren</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiere</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiendo</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiéndo</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantándo"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordimos</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordí</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordisteis</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiste</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordieron</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordió</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordamos</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordámo</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantémo"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordámos</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantémos"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orded</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orde</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__canta"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>orded</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantad"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordé</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantá"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordéd</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantád"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uerde</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uérde</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cánta"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uerdan</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uérdan</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantándo"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uerda</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>uérda</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantándo"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>order</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>order</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantar"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordér</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
			 </p>
			 <par n="S__cantár"/>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordíamos</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordía</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordíais</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordías</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordían</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordía</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiéramos</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiésemos</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiera</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiese</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordierais</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ordieseis</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordieras</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ordieses</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordieran</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiesen</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiera</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e r="LR">
			 <p>
				 <l>ordiese</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordidas</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 
		 <e>
			 <p>
				 <l>ordida</l>
				 <r>order<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			 </p>
		 </e>
		 

<e lm="morder">
	<i>m</i>
	<par n="m/order__vblex"/>
</e>
